Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 2 Nonfiscal Retirement Bills

47-20-32.
Prerequisites to introduction of nonfiscal retirement bill.

As a condition precedent to the introduction of any retirement bill, the member of the General Assembly who intends to be the primary sponsor of the bill must present an exact copy of the proposed bill, which must bear an LC number, to the state auditor.
The state auditor shall determine whether the proposed bill is a retirement bill having a fiscal impact or a nonfiscal retirement bill and provide a written certification of that determination to the member of the General Assembly who intends to be the primary sponsor of the bill.
Such certification shall specifically identify the proposed bill by reference to the LC number.
If the proposed bill is introduced into the General Assembly, it shall have attached thereto the original of the certification of the state auditor.
If the LC number on the bill as offered for introduction is different from the LC number shown on the state auditor’s certification or if the bill as offered for introduction does not bear an LC number on each page of the bill, the bill may not be accepted for introduction by the Secretary of the Senate or the Clerk of the House of Representatives, and the bill may not be considered by any committee of the House or Senate or by the House or Senate. If the bill is certified as a retirement bill having a fiscal impact, its introduction shall also be limited by the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-34.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 146, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 353, § 1.

47-20-33.
Amendment of a nonfiscal retirement bill.

A nonfiscal retirement bill may be introduced at any time during the first 20 days of any regular session of the General Assembly. After its introduction into the General Assembly, a nonfiscal retirement bill may not be amended in any manner to cause the bill to become a retirement bill having a fiscal impact. Any amendment to such a bill shall be submitted to the state auditor by the chairman of the committee, if a committee amendment, or by the presiding officer of the Senate or House if the amendment was made by the Senate or House. If the state auditor certifies in writing that the amendment does not cause the bill to become a retirement bill having a fiscal impact, the bill, as amended, may continue in the legislative process as any other bill. If the state auditor will not issue such a certification for the amendment, the bill’s progress in the legislative process will end, and the bill shall not be considered further by either the House or the Senate, and, if passed by the General Assembly, the bill shall not become law and shall stand repealed in its entirety on the first day of July immediately following its enactment.

An amendment to a nonfiscal retirement bill which is prohibited by subsection (a) of this Code section may be withdrawn by the committee which made the amendment, if a committee amendment, or by the Senate, if that body made the amendment, or by the House, if that body made the amendment. If the amendment is withdrawn, the bill may continue in the legislative process as any other bill, unless it is subsequently amended, and, in that event, this Code section shall apply to the subsequent amendment.

A nonfiscal retirement bill which is not amended during the legislative process may be considered as any other bill.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 240, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 353, § 2.